Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-57-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Metropolitan Hospital Authority Act.”

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4001.

7-57-102. Purpose and policy.

It is hereby determined and declared that the present and projected rapid growth of the demand for health care, the need for health care facilities in the metropolitan regions of the state, the realization that the optimum in health care is preventive by nature, and the great demand for capital and operating funds, all require that local governments in metropolitan areas have the option of placing the control and operation of metropolitan hospitals and other health care activities in regional and metropolitan instrumentalities.

It is hereby further declared that hospital authorities created pursuant to this chapter shall be public and governmental bodies acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating and participating municipalities and that the acquisition, operation, and financing of hospitals and related facilities by such hospital authorities are hereby declared to be for a public and governmental purpose and a matter of public necessity.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-4002.

7-57-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “hospital authority” means a public body and a body corporate and public organized in accordance with this chapter for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in this chapter;

“Board” means the board of trustees of an authority;

“Creating municipality” means any city or metropolitan government having a population of not less than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or any county in which any such city shall be situated, that shall create an authority pursuant to this chapter;

“Executive officer” means the mayor, county mayor, or other chief executive officer of any creating or participating municipality;

“Federal government” includes the United States or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States;

“Governing body” means the chief legislative body of any creating or participating municipality; in counties having the commission form of government “chief legislative body” means the county legislative body;

“Hospital” and “hospital project” means and includes any one (1) or more hospitals and related facilities, including, but not limited to, land and interests in land, facilities and equipment for the treatment of all classes of patients, laboratories, clinics, treatment centers, nursing homes, rehabilitation centers, extended care facilities, dormitories, training facilities for medical students, doctors, nurses and all other medical or paramedical personnel, administration and office buildings, garages, parking lots and such other structures, facilities and improvements necessary or convenient to the development and maintenance of hospitals, and for the provision of health care;

“Ordinance” means any ordinance adopted by governing bodies pursuant to this chapter;

“Participating municipality” means any city, town or county, which city, town or county, pursuant to a resolution of its governing body and an agreement with the creating municipality, shall have sold, leased, dedicated, donated or otherwise conveyed its hospitals to the authority for operation by the authority in order to make such hospital an operational part of its health care system;

“Resolution” means any resolution adopted by governing bodies pursuant to this chapter;

“State” means the state of Tennessee; and

“Trustee” means one (1) of the members of the board of an authority appointed in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 6-4003; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-57-104. Duty of the authority and trustees of the authority.

The authority and its trustees shall be under a statutory duty to comply or to cause compliance strictly with all provisions of this chapter and the laws of the state, and, in addition, with each and every term, provision and covenant in any contract of the authority on its part to be kept or performed.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-4007.

7-57-105. Dissolution — Disposition of property.

Whenever the governing body or bodies of the creating municipality or municipalities and the participating municipality or municipalities shall each, by resolution, determine that the purposes for which the authority was created have been substantially accomplished, that all of the obligations of the authority have been fully paid, or provided for, and that such municipalities have agreed on the distribution of the funds and other properties of the authority, then the chief executive officer or officers of such municipality or municipalities shall execute and file for record with the secretary of state a joint certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Upon such filing, the authority shall be dissolved, and title to all funds and other properties of the authority at the time of such dissolution shall vest in and be delivered to such municipalities in accordance with the terms of their agreement.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 20; T.C.A., § 6-4023.

7-57-106. Supplemental nature of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and are not in substitution for such powers, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect such powers. The powers granted in this chapter may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law or charter, except as expressly provided in this chapter. Any metropolitan government or any home rule municipality authorized under this chapter to create a metropolitan hospital authority may do so without the necessity of a charter amendment, notwithstanding anything in its charter to the contrary.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 21; T.C.A., § 6-4024.

7-57-107. Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this chapter, and insofar as this chapter may be inconsistent with any other law, this chapter shall be controlling.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 23; T.C.A., § 6-4025.